Wyoming, session 2025, SF0144.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-12-1601 through 9-12-1603 are
created to read:

9-12-1601. Commission; created; definitions.

(a) There is created the Wyoming-Ireland Trade
Commission.

SF0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0346
(b) As used in this article, "commission" means the
Wyoming-Ireland Trade Commission.

9-12-1602. Membership.

(a) The commission shall consist of nine (9) members,
to be appointed as follows:

(i) Two (2) persons appointed by the governor;

(ii) Two (2) members of the house of
representatives appointed by the speaker of the house;

(iii) Two (2) members of the senate appointed by
the president of the senate;

(iv) One (1) member of the house appointed by
the minority leader of the house of representatives;

(v) One (1) member of the senate appointed by
the senate minority leader; and

SF0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0346
(vi) One (1) person to be appointed by the
board.

(b) The members selected by the governor and the
board shall each be a representative of one (1) or more of
the following:

(i) A Wyoming public institution of higher
education;

(ii) The Irish-American community in Wyoming who
is interested in furthering trade between Wyoming and
Ireland;

(iii) A Wyoming industry engaged in or seeking
to engage in trade with Ireland;

(iv) A Wyoming business association, trade
organization, economic development organization or chamber
of commerce currently engaged in or interested in engaging
in the furtherance of trade with Ireland.

SF0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0346
(c) Members of the commission who are not legislative
members shall serve for a two (2) year term. Legislative
members shall serve for the two (2) year biennial
legislative session in which they are appointed to the
commission and shall remain members of the legislature in
order to retain membership on the commission. Members may
be reappointed. Terms shall begin March 1 of year in which
the legislature meets in general session.

(d) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as
the original appointment and shall be filled only for the
unexpired part of the term.

(e) The appointing authority for any member may
remove the member without cause and substitute another
appointee for the member at any time.

(f) The commission shall hold meetings not less than
once each calendar quarter. Meetings shall be held at the
call of the chairman. At the initial meeting of the
commission and annually thereafter, the members shall
select from among the appointed legislators one (1) member
to serve as the chairman. A majority of the members of the
SF0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0346
commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
the business of the commission.

(g) The chairman may appoint from among the
commission members subcommittees and subcommittee chairmen.

(h) Necessary clerical and administrative support for
the commission shall be furnished by the council.

(j) Nonlegislative members of the commission shall
receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed under W.S.
9-3-102 and 9-3-103 for per diem and travel expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties on the
commission. Nonlegislative members who are government
employees or public officials shall be considered on
official business of their agency when performing duties as
members of the commission.

(k) The legislative members of the commission shall
receive salary and reimbursement for per diem and travel
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties on the
commission, as provided in W.S. 28-5-101.

SF0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0346
9-12-1603. Purposes; reporting.

(a) The purpose of the Wyoming-Ireland Trade
Commission shall be to advance, promote and encourage
business and other mutually beneficial activities between
Wyoming and Ireland, including:

(i) Bilateral trade and investment;

(ii) Joint action on policy issues of mutual
interest;

(iii) Business and academic exchanges;

(iv) Mutual economic support;

(v) Mutual investment in the respective
infrastructure; and

(vi) Other opportunities for mutual benefit and
economic growth as identified by the commission.

SF0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0346
(b) The commission shall report its findings,
activities, results and recommendations to the governor,
the speaker of the house of representatives and the
president of the senate not later than one (1) year after
its initial meeting and by November 1 of each succeeding
year for the activities of the preceding calendar year. The
report shall be in writing and may include recommendations
or proposed legislation as deemed appropriate by the
commission to effectuate its purposes.

Section 2. W.S. 9-12-102(a)(viii) is amended to read:

9-12-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act, the following terms have the
following meanings, except where the context clearly
indicates otherwise:

(viii) "This act" means W.S. 9-12-101 through
9-12-1509 9-12-1603.

Section 3.

SF0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0346
(a) Per diem and travel expenses for members of the
commission shall be provided from the following sources
for:

(i) Legislative members of the commission, by
management council as provided by 2024 Wyo. Session Laws,
Chapter 59, Section 9;

(ii) Nonlegislative members of the commission:

(A) Who are not government employees, from
funds appropriated to the governor's office in 2024 Wyo.
Session Laws, Chapter 118, Section 2, Section 001 for
international trade marketing;

(B) Who are government employees, from
funds appropriated to their agency in 2024 Wyo. Session
Laws, Chapter 118, Section 2.

SF0144

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0346
Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0144